Washington statutes.
RCW 36.75.110

True locations to be determined—Survey.

Whenever the board declares by resolution that the true location, course, or width of any county road is uncertain and that the same should be determined, it shall direct the county road engineer to make examination and survey thereof.

This shall embrace an examination and survey of the original petition, report, and field notes on the establishment of such road; a survey of the present traveled roadway; all topography within a reasonable distance and having a bearing on the true location of such road; the distance from the center line of the traveled roadway to the nearest section and quarter section corners; a map of sufficient scale accurately showing the above with field notes thereon; a map on the same scale showing the original field notes, such field notes to be transposed and the same meridian used on both maps.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.75.110. Prior: 1937 c 187 s 12; RRS s 6450-12.]